South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 17 Cash Payment Section 1-1-1110.  Any establishment that holds a retail license to do business in this State must accept cash payments for transactions. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----